Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 5. MATTERS AFFECTING PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE C. MATTERS AFFECTING PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES OF MORE THAN ONE TYPE OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT

CHAPTER 177. LIFE, HEALTH, AND ACCIDENT INSURANCE FOR OFFICIALS, EMPLOYEES, AND RETIREES OF POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 177.001. CERTAIN COVERAGE AUTHORIZED. (a) A county or other political subdivision of this state may procure contracts insuring the political subdivision's officials, employees, and retirees or any class of the political subdivision's officials, employees, and retirees under a policy of group life, group health, accident, accidental death and dismemberment, or hospital, surgical, or medical expense insurance.

(b) The dependents of those officials, employees, and retirees may be insured under a group policy that provides:

(1) health insurance; or

(2) hospital, surgical, or medical expense insurance.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1K.002, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 177.002. PAYMENT OF PREMIUMS. (a) A county or other political subdivision of this state that is authorized to procure a contract insuring the political subdivision's officials, employees, and retirees or any class of the political subdivision's officials, employees, and retirees under a policy of group insurance that covers one or more risks may pay from the local funds of the political subdivision all or any portion of the premiums for the policy. The political subdivision may also pay all or any portion of the premiums on group health, hospital, surgical, or medical expense insurance for dependents of the political subdivision's officials, employees, and retirees.

(b) If authorized by the official, employee, or retiree in writing to make the deduction, the county or other political subdivision may deduct from the person's salary an amount equal to any required contribution by the person to the premiums for the insurance issued under Section 177.001 to the political subdivision as the policyholder.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1K.002, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 177.003. USE OF STATE FUNDS. State funds may not be used to procure a contract under this subchapter or pay premiums under that contract.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1K.002, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. HEALTH AND INSURANCE FUND

Sec. 177.051. FUND AUTHORIZED. (a) A county or other political subdivision of this state may establish a fund to provide insurance authorized by Subchapter A.

(b) A fund established under Subsection (a) shall be known as the "health and insurance fund--employees and dependents."

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1K.002, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 177.052. PAYMENT OF MONEY INTO FUND. There shall be credited to a fund established under this subchapter:

(1) any salary deduction to which an official, employee, or retiree agrees in writing; and

(2) contributions from the county or other political subdivision.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1K.002, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 177.053. USE OF MONEY IN FUND. Payment from a fund established under this subchapter:

(1) is authorized only for the payment of premiums on life, group health, accident, accidental death and dismemberment, or hospital, surgical, or medical expense insurance for officials, employees, retirees, and their dependents; and

(2) must be made in accordance with rules adopted by the county or other political subdivision establishing the fund.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1K.002, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 177.054. PAYMENT OF CLAIMS FROM FUND. A claim against a fund established under this subchapter shall be payable in the same manner as other claims of the county or other political subdivision.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1K.002, eff. April 1, 2009.